fr: Forme des meules: Conique; Plate; Autre
bg-BG: Форма на мелещия диск: Конично; Плоско; Друго
sl-SI: Oblika rezila: Stožec; Ploščata; Druga
hr-HR: Oblik brusa: Konusna; Ravna; Ostalo
tr: Diş şekli: Konik; Düz; Diğer
vi: Hình dạng lưỡi nghiền: Hình nón; Phẳng; Khác
de: Mahlwerksform: Konisch; Flach; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Tvar mlecích kameňov: Kónický; Rovný; Iné
pt-PT: Forma da lâmina: Cónico; Plano; Outro
sv: Burrkvarnens form: Konisk; Platt; Övrigt
lt-LT: Girnų forma: Kūgis; Plokščias; Kita
pl: Kształty żaren: Stożkowy; Płaskie; Pozostałe
zh-CN: 磨盘的形状: 锥形; 平形; 其他
el: Σχήμα μύλου (burr): Κωνικό; Επίπεδο; Άλλο
hu: Perem formája: Kúpos; Lapos; Egyéb
th: รูปทรงของเฟืองบด: ทรงกรวย; แบบแบน; อื่นๆ
fi: Jauhinterän muoto: Kartiomainen; Tasainen; Muu
zh-TW: 刀盤形狀: 錐型; 平坦型; 其他
ru: Форма жерновов: Коническая; Плоская; Другая
cs: Tvar mlecích kamenů: Kónické; Ploché; Jiné
nb: Borhode-form: Konisk; Flat; Annet
da: Fræserstiftform: Konisk; Flad; Andet
nl: Burr-vorm: Conisch; Vlak; Overig
pt-BR: Formato da rebarba: Cônico; Plano; Outro
en: Burr shape: Conical; Flat; Other
it: Forma della macina: Conico; Piatto; Altro
ko: 그라인더 버 형상: 코니컬; 플랫; 기타
es: Forma de la fresa: Cónico; Plano; Otros
ja: バリの形状: 円錐形; フラット; その他
ro-RO: Forma piesei de măcinare: Conic; Plat; Altele